Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-404
Athletic trainer, defined.

Athletic trainer means a health care professional who is licensed to practice athletic training under the Athletic Training Practice Act or the Athletic Trainer Compact and who, under guidelines established with a licensed physician, performs the functions outlined in section 38-408 except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of section 38-408.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 176;

Laws 2022, LB436, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 9.
January 1, 2027
Athletic Trainer Compact, see section 38-5201.